Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6678YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2301 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 692D.1 Domestic abuse offender 1 registry. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âConvictedâ means found guilty of, pleaded guilty to, 4 or has been sentenced or adjudicated delinquent for an act 5 that is an indictable offense in this state or in another 6 jurisdiction including in a federal, military, tribal, or 7 foreign court, including but not limited to a juvenile who has 8 been adjudicated delinquent, but whose juvenile court records 9 have been sealed under section 232.150, and a person who has 10 received a deferred sentence or a deferred judgment or has 11 been acquitted by reason of insanity. âConvictedâ includes the 12 conviction of a juvenile prosecuted as an adult. âConvictedâ 13 also includes a conviction for an attempt or conspiracy to 14 commit an offense. âConvictedâ does not mean a plea, sentence, 15 adjudication, deferred sentence, or deferred judgment that has 16 been reversed or otherwise set aside. 17 b. âDepartmentâ means the department of public safety. 18 c. âDomestic abuse assaultâ means an assault, as defined in 19 section 708.1, that is domestic abuse as defined in section 20 236.2, subsection 2. 21 d. âPersistent domestic abuse assault offenderâ means a 22 person who has been convicted of a violation of section 708.2A 23 who has at least one prior conviction under section 708.2A. 24 2. There is created within the department a registry of 25 persistent domestic abuse assault offenders. 26 3. The department shall maintain this registry based upon 27 information supplied to the department by the court clerks 28 pursuant to subsections 4 and 5 and information available to 29 the department from the department of corrections and local law 30 enforcement agencies. The department shall make the registry 31 available for public inquiry on the departmentâs internet site. 32 4. The registry shall include all of the following 33 information about a persistent domestic abuse assault offender: 34 a. The persistent domestic abuse assault offenderâs name, 35 -1- LSB 6678YH (1) 91 as/js 1/ 5 H.F. 2301 date of birth, conviction date, and county or counties of 1 convictions. 2 b. A photograph of the persistent domestic abuse assault 3 offender. 4 5. a. If available, the court clerk shall provide the 5 department with a copy of the persistent domestic abuse 6 assault offenderâs driverâs license, or other state or 7 federal identification, and such other identifying data as the 8 department determines is necessary to properly identify the 9 persistent domestic abuse assault offender and exclude innocent 10 persons. 11 b. The registry available for public inquiry must not 12 include the persistent domestic abuse assault offenderâs 13 address, social security number, driverâs license number, or 14 any other state or federal identification number. 15 6. If a person is convicted under section 708.2A and the 16 person convicted has at least one prior conviction under 17 section 708.2A, then the court shall, upon proof of any prior 18 convictions under section 708.2A, order the defendant to 19 register as a persistent domestic abuse assault offender under 20 this section. 21 7. If a court orders a defendant to register under this 22 section, then the court clerk shall forward to the department 23 a certified copy of the qualifying conviction and the date of 24 birth of the defendant. The court clerk shall forward the 25 information to the department within seven days of the date of 26 the conviction. 27 8. A defendant required to register under this section shall 28 be assessed a registration fee in the amount of one hundred 29 fifty dollars, which must be paid to the clerk of the court 30 imposing the sentence, who shall do all of the following: 31 a. Retain fifty dollars of the fee as appropriated receipts, 32 as defined in section 8.2, to be used for the administration of 33 this section. 34 b. Remit one hundred dollars of the fee to the department 35 -2- LSB 6678YH (1) 91 as/js 2/ 5 H.F. 2301 to be retained as appropriated receipts, as defined in section 1 8.2, to be used for the administration of this section. 2 9. The department shall remove from the registry the name 3 and other identifying information of a persistent domestic 4 abuse assault offender required to register under this section 5 as follows: 6 a. Two years after the date of the most recent conviction 7 under section 708.2A if the defendant has one prior conviction 8 under section 708.2A. 9 b. Five years after the date of the most recent conviction 10 under section 708.2A if the defendant has two prior convictions 11 under section 708.2A. 12 c. Ten years after the date of the most recent conviction 13 under section 708.2A if the defendant has three or more prior 14 convictions under section 708.2A. 15 10. This section applies only to persons convicted under 16 section 708.2A for offenses that occurred on or after July 17 1, 2026, provided, however, that a prior conviction is not 18 required to have occurred on or after July 1, 2026, for 19 purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a 20 persistent domestic abuse assault offender. 21 Sec. 2. Section 708.2A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 1. For the purposes of this chapter , âdomestic abuse 24 assaultâ means an assault, as defined in section 708.1 , which 25 that is domestic abuse as defined in section 236.2, subsection 26 2 , paragraph âaâ , âbâ , âcâ , or âdâ . 27